Morphological-Analysis/Finnish-01/finnish.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Multichar_Symbols

+Noun                ! POS
+Verb                ! POS

!! LEXICON Verb-Inflection-I

+Infinitive-A
+1Person_Singular
+2Person_Singular
+1Person_Plural
+2Person_Plural
+3Person_Plural

!! LEXICON Noun-Inflection-I

+Nominative
+Genitive
+Inessive
+Adessive
+Allative
+Elative
+Ablative
+Essive
+Translative

!! %>                        !! morpheme boundary (Apertium)

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Root

Noun-stems ;
Verb-stems ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Verb-Inflection-I

+Infinitive-A:a # ;
+1Person_Singular:n # ;
+2Person_Singular:t # ;
+1Person_Plural:mme # ;
+2Person_Plural:tte # ;
+3Person_Plural:vat # ;

!! for VERB-FR class: verbs with no back vowels
LEXICON Verb-Inflection-FR

+Infinitive-A:ä # ;
+1Person_Singular:n # ;
+2Person_Singular:t # ;
+1Person_Plural:mme # ;
+2Person_Plural:tte # ;
+3Person_Plural:vät # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Noun-Inflection-I

!! OK too: 
!! +Nominative:    # ; !!                       Nominative

+Nominative:    # ; !!
+Genitive:n    # ; !! of
+Inessive:ssa  # ; !! in
+Adessive:lla  # ; !! at
+Allative:lle  # ; !! onto
+Elative:sta  # ; !! out-of from-within
+Ablative:lta  # ; !! from             
+Essive:na   # ; !! as                 
+Translative:ksi  # ; !! as-into       


LEXICON Noun-Inflection-FR

+Nominative:    # ; !!              
+Genitive:n    # ; !! of             
+Inessive:ssä  # ; !! in             
+Adessive:llä  # ; !! at             
+Allative:lle  # ; !! onto           
+Elative:stä  # ; !! out-of from-within
+Ablative:ltä  # ; !! from             
+Essive:nä   # ; !! as                 
+Translative:ksi  # ; !! as-into       


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Noun-stems

talo+Noun:talo    Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (house)
pala+Noun:pala    Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (piece)
savu+Noun:savu    Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (smoke)

isä+Noun:isä      Noun-Inflection-FR ;  ! (father)
hissi+Noun:hissi  Noun-Inflection-FR ;  ! (lift)


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Verb-stems

palaa+Verb:pala    Verb-Inflection-I ;   ! (burn)
ajaa+Verb:aja      Verb-Inflection-I ;   ! (drive)

kysyä+Verb:kysy    Verb-Inflection-FR ;  ! (ask)
kestää+Verb:kestä  Verb-Inflection-FR ;  ! (last)
